Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-4607
District; adoption or revision of rules and regulations; procedure; availability.

Before adopting or revising its rules and regulations, each district shall, after publishing notice once each week for three consecutive weeks in a newspaper or newspapers having general circulation within the district, conduct a public hearing on the proposed rules and regulations or changes. The rules and regulations of the district shall be made available for public inspection at the principal office of the district.

Laws 1986, LB 474, § 7.